Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 25. General Provisions Relating to Counties and Municipalities

§ 17-25-1.
County boards of supervisors and municipal governing authorities authorized to allow payment of taxes, fees and other accounts receivable and payment for retail merchandise sold by county or municipality by credit card, charge card, debit card, etc.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality may allow the payment of various taxes, fees and other accounts receivable to the county or municipality, and the payment for retail merchandise sold by the county or municipality, by credit cards, charge cards, debit cards and other forms of electronic payment, in accordance with policies established by the State Auditor. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any fees or charges associated with the use of such electronic payments shall be assessed to the user of the electronic payment as an additional charge for processing the electronic payment, so that the user will pay the full cost of using the electronic payment. However, a county or municipality shall not charge the user any additional amount above the processing fee on each transaction. For purposes of this section, the term “accounts receivable” includes, but is not limited to, judgments, fines, costs and penalties imposed upon conviction for criminal and traffic offenses.A county or municipality may bear the full cost of processing such electronic payments for retail merchandise sold by the county or municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 511, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 371, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 17-25-3.
Lease or conveyance of property to nonprofit primary health care clinic.

The governing body of any county or municipality, in its discretion, may sell, lease or convey, with or without consideration and upon such terms and conditions as the parties may agree, any land, buildings, fixtures, equipment or other real or personal property belonging to the county or municipality that is determined by the governing body as no longer needed by the county or municipality for governmental purposes, to any nonprofit primary health care clinic, which is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code located or to be located in the county for the purpose of assisting any such clinic to provide primary health care services to residents who are employed or temporarily out of work and who do not have health insurance. If such property is sold, leased or conveyed without consideration, the governing body of the county or municipality shall state in its minutes the purpose for which the property shall be used, and such property shall revert to the county or municipality whenever it ceases to be used for that stated purpose.

As used in this section, the term “governing body” means the board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 477, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 17-25-5.
Municipalities and counties to grant examination reciprocity to contractors licensed by another municipality or county; conditions for granting reciprocity.

Every municipality and county of the State of Mississippi shall grant competency examination reciprocity to any contractor, including, but not limited to, any electrical, plumbing, heating and air conditioning, water and sewer, roofing or mechanical contractor, who is licensed by another municipality or county of this state without imposing any further competency examination requirements provided:

That the contractor furnishes evidence that he has a license issued on the basis of a competency examination administered in one (1) municipality or county of the State of Mississippi which has an examining board that regularly gives a written examination which has been approved by the State Board of Public Contractors or the Building Officials Association of Mississippi;

That he furnishes evidence that he actually took and passed the written examination which qualified him for such license; however, in lieu thereof, he may furnish evidence that he was issued a license prior to May 1, 1972, and prior to the existence of a written examination by a county or municipality which has an examining board that requires written examination to qualify for a license;

That he has been actively engaged in the business for which he is licensed for two (2) years or more;

That he has held a license for his business for one (1) year or more; and

That he pays the license fee to the municipality or county to which application is made for a license unless he holds a current certificate of responsibility issued by the State Board of Public Contractors, in which case no license fee shall be collected.

Any contractor who operates more than one (1) separate place of business within the state must obtain the appropriate privilege license and pay the privilege license fee for each location if required by the local jurisdiction.

Every jurisdiction in which a contractor does business may impose its own separate bonding requirements on the contractor desiring to do business there.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 539, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 17-25-7.
Prohibition against ordinance restricting woman’s right to breast-feed absent state authorization.

No county, municipality or other political subdivision shall enact any ordinance restricting a woman’s right to breast-feed her child until such time as the state may authorize a county, municipality or other political subdivision to enact such an ordinance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 520, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).

§ 17-25-9.
Mother may breast-feed her child in any location she is otherwise authorized to be.

A mother may breast-feed her child in any location, public or private, where the mother is otherwise authorized to be, without respect to whether the mother’s breast or any part of it is covered during or incidental to the breast-feeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 520, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).

§ 17-25-11.
County boards of supervisors and municipal governing authorities authorized to allow off-duty law enforcement officers to use public uniforms and weapons in performance of certain private security duties.

Certified law enforcement officers or certified part-time law enforcement officers, as defined in Section 45-6-3, who are employed by a county or municipality may wear the official uniform and may utilize the official firearm issued by the employing jurisdiction while in the performance of private security services in off-duty hours. The governing authority of a municipality must approve of such use of the uniform and official weapon by municipal law enforcement officers by act spread upon the minutes of such board and approved by the chief executive. The sheriff of a county must approve such use of the uniform and official weapon by deputy sheriffs. Approval shall be on an employee-by-employee basis and not by general order. Any proceedings regarding application or approval and the minutes regarding same shall be a public record.

Each governing board and chief executive or sheriff shall determine before the use of the official uniform and weapon is approved that the proposed employment is not likely to bring disrepute to the employing jurisdiction or its law enforcement agency, the officer at issue, or law enforcement generally, and that the use of the official uniform and weapon in the discharge of the officer’s private security endeavor promotes the public interest.

Acts and omissions of an officer in discharge of private security employment shall be deemed to be the acts and omissions of the person or entity employing the officer for such private security services, and not the acts and omissions of the jurisdiction whose uniform and weapon are approved for such private security use. An employer employing the officer for private security services shall hold harmless the jurisdiction by which the officer is employed and fully indemnify the jurisdiction for any expense or loss, including attorney’s fees, which results from any action taken against the jurisdiction arising out of the acts or omissions of the officer in discharge of private security services while wearing the official uniform or using the official weapon. Neither the state nor any subdivision thereof shall be liable for acts or omissions of an officer in the discharge of the private security employment duties.

Certified police officers performing private jobs during their off-duty hours are required to notify the appropriate law enforcement agency of the place of employment, the hours to be worked, and the type of employment.

The official uniform and weapon may be worn and utilized only at locations which are within the jurisdiction of the governmental entity whose uniform and weapon are involved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 568, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2006.).

§ 17-25-13.
Procedure to assist in collection of delinquent water sewer service bills by counties, municipalities and water sewer associations.

For purposes of this section:

“Water sewer association” means any corporation, whether for profit or not for profit, that provides, distributes, transmits, treats, pumps, or stores raw or potable water to, or for the benefit of, members of the general public or commercial, industrial and other users; and

“Water sewer system” means any entity that provides, distributes, transmits, treats, pumps or stores raw or potable water to or for the benefit of members of the general public and commercial, industrial, and other users, including, without limitation, the following entities that perform such activities:

Municipalities;

Counties; and

Water sewer associations.

When a person is delinquent on the payment of an undisputed bill for water sewer service provided by a water sewer system within this state, moves into another area of this state, and applies for or receives water from another water sewer system, if the person’s former water sewer system establishes that there is no dispute that the delinquent amount is properly due and owed by that particular individual in that amount, the new water sewer system shall refuse to provide water sewer service to the delinquent person until such person provides proof of curing the delinquency.

This subsection shall not apply to a delinquency that has been disputed by the person in writing, unless the delinquency has been reduced to a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction.

No provision of this section shall apply to a water sewer system that is regulated by the Mississippi Public Service Commission as a “public utility” as defined in Section 77-3-3.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 312, §§ 1 and 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 17-25-15.
Prohibition against enactment of certain new ordinances affecting existing qualified sport-shooting ranges; criteria for qualifying for ordinance exemptions.

An established sport-shooting range that is not in violation of a state law or an ordinance of a unit of local government prior to the enactment of a new ordinance of a unit of local government affecting the range may continue in operation even if, at or after the time of the enactment of the new ordinance, the operation of the sport-shooting range is not in compliance with the new ordinance.

In order to qualify for the provisions of this subsection, an established outdoor shooting range must be:

Constructed in a manner not reasonably expected to allow a projectile to cross the boundary of the tract; or

Located on a tract of land of ten (10) acres or more and with any firing line more than one hundred fifty (150) feet from a residence or occupied building located on another property if a shotgun, air rifle or air pistol, BB gun or bow and arrow is discharged; or

Located on a tract of land of fifty (50) acres or more and with any firing line more than three hundred (300) feet from a residence or occupied building located on another property if a center fire or rimfire rifle or pistol or a muzzle-loading rifle or pistol of any caliber is discharged.

No new ordinance of a local unit of government shall prohibit an established sport-shooting range that is in existence on July 1, 2016, from doing any of the following within the existing geographic boundaries of the sport-shooting range:

Repair, remodel or reinforce any building or improvement as may be necessary in the interest of public safety or to secure the continued use of the building or improvement;

Reconstruct, repair, rebuild or resume the use of a facility or building damaged or destroyed, in whole or in part, by fire, collapse, explosion, act of nature or act of war occurring after March 31, 2008;

Expand or enhance its membership or opportunities for public participation;

Expand or increase facilities or activities.

The right to operate as a sport-shooting range shall not be amended, restricted, or terminated due to a change of circumstances regarding the use of adjacent or surrounding properties to the extent that any sport-shooting range has been issued permission to operate as a sport-shooting range, whether as of right or by special exception, variance, or otherwise, by any entity having zoning or zoning appeal authority.

A person who subsequently acquires title to or leases or otherwise uses or exercises control over real property adversely affected by the normal operation or use of property with an established sport-shooting range shall not maintain a nuisance action against the range or the person who owns, leases or otherwise uses or exercises control over the range to restrain, enjoin or impede the use of the range.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 385, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 409, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 17-25-17.
Reimbursement of steel rebar micro-mills for costs incurred for site preparation, real estate improvements, railroads, roads, utilities and infrastructure related to project.

As used in this section, “project” means a major steel rebar micro-mill for use in the manufacture of steel rebar with an initial capital investment from private sources of not less than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) which will create at least one hundred (100) full-time jobs with an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), and for which construction begins on or before September 15, 2010.

The governing authorities of any municipality or the board of supervisors of any county in which there is to be located a project may provide funds to the enterprise owning or leasing the project in order to reimburse the enterprise for costs it incurs for site preparation, real estate improvements, railroads, roads, utilities and infrastructure related to the project. Reimbursements shall be made with local funds and may include, but not be limited to, the proceeds of bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 42, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 520, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 14, 2010.).

§ 17-25-19.
Prohibition against ordinance authorizing use of automated recording equipment to enforce compliance with or impose penalties for violation of traffic laws.

Neither the board of supervisors of any county nor the governing authority of any municipality shall adopt, enact or enforce any ordinance authorizing the use of automated recording equipment or system to enforce compliance with traffic signals, traffic speeds or other traffic laws, rules or regulations on any public street, road or highway within this state or to impose or collect any civil or criminal fine, fee or penalty for any such violation.

Any county or municipality using automated recording equipment or system shall remove the equipment or system before October 1, 2009.

For the purposes of this section, the term “automated recording equipment or system” means a camera or optical device installed to work in conjunction with a traffic control signal or radar speed detection equipment or both and designed to record images that depict the license plate attached to the rear of a motor vehicle that is not operated in compliance with instructions of the traffic control signal or the posted speed limit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 416, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2009.).

§ 17-25-21.
Authorization to enter into collection agreements to collect cash appearance bonds from certain defendants.

The board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, and the governing authority of any municipality, in its discretion, may proceed under Section 19-3-41(2), in the case of a county, or under 21-17-1(6), in the case of a municipality, to contract with a private attorney, private collection agent or agency, or the office of the district attorney for the circuit court district in which the county or municipality is located to collect cash appearance bonds from any defendant who has failed to appear in court within ninety (90) days after the court date is set for the defendant, subject to the right of a defendant who is charged with an offense to a trial on the merits of the charge against him, so that the court may authorize the clerk to give notice to any defendant who has failed to appear at the time set that collection fees may be included as part of the court costs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 517, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 17-25-23.
Authorization to enter into agreements with approved business enterprises under certain circumstances; authorization to enter into fee-in-lieu agreements.

As used in this section:

“Enterprise” means an approved business enterprise as defined in Section 57-1-221.

“Project” means a project as defined in Section 57-1-221 with a minimum capital investment in this state of not less than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00).

The board of supervisors of a county or the governing authorities of a municipality may each enter into an agreement with an enterprise that receives a loan for a project under Section 57-1-221, that provides that the county or municipality will not levy any taxes, fees or assessments upon the enterprise other than taxes, fees or assessments that are generally levied upon all taxpayers.

The board of supervisors of a county or the governing authorities of a municipality may each enter into a fee-in-lieu agreement as provided in Section 27-31-104, with an enterprise that receives a loan for a project under Section 57-1-221.

The agreements authorized in this section may be for a period not to exceed twenty (20) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 301, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Jan. 10, 2011.).

§ 17-25-25.
Uniform requirements for disposal of personal property belonging to county or municipality.

General.The governing authority of a county or municipality may sell or dispose of any personal property or real property belonging to the governing authority when the property has ceased to be used for public purposes or when, in the authority’s judgment, a sale thereof would promote the best interest of the governing authority. For purposes of this section, the term “personal property,” includes, but is not limited to, equipment, vehicles, fixtures, furniture, firearms and commodities.

Public sale.At least ten (10) days before bid opening, the governing authority shall advertise its acceptance of bids by posting notices at three (3) public places located in the county or municipality that the governing authority serves. One (1) of the three (3) notices shall be posted at the governing authority’s main office. The governing authority may designate the manner by which the bids will be received, including, but not limited to, bids sealed in an envelope, bids made electronically or bids made by any other method that promotes open competition. The proceeds of the sale shall be placed in a properly approved depository to the credit of the proper fund.

Private sale.Where the personal property does not exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in value, the governing authority, by a unanimous approval of its members, may sell or dispose of the property at a private sale. The proceeds of the sale shall be placed in a properly approved depository to the credit of the proper fund.

Public auction.The governing authority of a county or municipality may sell or dispose of any surplus personal or real property at a public auction that shall be conducted by an auctioneer or auction company that meets the standards established by the State Department of Audit and is hired by the governing authority of a county or municipality.

If the governing authority finds that the fair market value of the personal property or real property is zero and this finding is entered on the minutes of the authority, then the governing authority may dispose of such property in the manner it deems appropriate and in its best interest, but no official or employee of the governing authority shall derive any personal economic benefit from such disposal.

If the property may be of use or benefit to any federal agency or authority, another governing authority or state agency of the State of Mississippi, or a state agency or governing authority of another state, it may be disposed of in accordance with Section 31-7-13(m)(vi).

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit, restrict or to prescribe conditions with regard to the authority granted under Section 17-25-3 or under Section 37-7-551. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any equipment disposed of pursuant to trade-in as part of a purchase.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 339, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 17-25-27.
Authorization to enter into certain agreements with economic development projects.

As used in this section, “economic development project” means any project in which the State of Mississippi has committed state or federal program funds to incentivize a company to locate or expand a business in the state and create or maintain jobs within the state.

The board of supervisors of a county or the governing authorities of a municipality may enter into agreements with an economic development project that are binding on future boards of supervisors of the county or governing authorities of the municipality:

To provide water, sewer and other county or municipal services; and/or

Providing that the board of supervisors or governing authorities will agree in advance to approve any request for exemption from ad valorem taxes in the manner provided by law and that any such exemption shall be for a period of ten (10) years.

The agreements authorized under this section may be for a period not to exceed twenty (20) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2012.).

§ 17-25-29.
Rights of members of member-owned water association or system to attend meetings; notice.

In addition to the rights prescribed in Section 79-11-177, a member of a member-owned rural water association or system, incorporated under Chapter 11, Title 79, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall have the right to attend regularly scheduled board meetings of the association or system. Further, if a meeting pertains to the election of board members for the association or system, then the association or system shall provide written notice of the meeting by mail at least fifteen (15) days in advance of the meeting at which the election will occur. The written notice shall also be included on any association’s or system’s invoice or statement that is submitted to the member within thirty (30) days of the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 526, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 17-25-31.
Sale of badge and helmet to retiring firefighter or spouse of firefighter killed in line of duty authorized.

Upon approval of the governing authority of the municipality or county, a member of any municipal or county fire protection department who retires or the spouse of a fireman who is killed in the line of duty may be allowed to purchase the helmet and badge that were issued to the fireman by the fire protection department from which he or she retired or by whom he or she was employed at the time of death. The governing authority of the municipality or county shall determine the amount to be paid for the helmet and badge by the retiring fireman or the spouse of the fireman. The governing authority of the municipality or county may approve such a sale for a helmet and badge issued to a volunteer fireman if the equipment was originally purchased using municipal or county funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 17-25-33.
Prohibition against law, rule, ordinance, etc. interfering with employer’s ability to be informed about employee or potential employee background.

No county, board of supervisors of a county, municipality, governing authority of a municipality or any other political subdivision shall adopt or maintain in effect any law, ordinance, or rule that creates requirements, regulations, processes or prohibitions that in any way interfere with an employer’s ability to become fully informed about the background of an employee or potential employee for the purpose of creating or maintaining a fair, secure, safe and productive workplace. Any ordinance or regulation that exists as of July 1, 2014, or is created after July 1, 2014, that violates the provisions of this section shall be explicitly preempted and voided by this section.

The Legislature recognizes that fair, secure and safe workplaces are critical to high employer and employee productivity and increased employer and employee productivity improve the economic health of our state. Because the employer is in the best position to understand the fairness, security and safety needs of his or her workplace, any law or ordinance that hinders an employer’s ability to meet the demands of such needs by limiting the ability of an employer to become informed about the background of an employee or potential employee, shall be declared unfair and against the laws and policies of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 340, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 17-25-35.
Continued payment of compensation and related benefits of county or municipality employees who protect public interest and are injured in the line of duty.

The governing authority of any municipality and the board of supervisors of any county may, in its discretion, adopt a policy to continue to pay all or a portion of the regular compensation and related benefits of any law enforcement officer, firefighter or other employee that protects the public interest of the municipality or county who is injured in the line of duty, during the time that the injured employee is physically unable to perform the duties of his or her employment, in accordance with the following:

The municipality or county may continue to pay all or a portion of the injured employee’s regular compensation and related benefits until such time as the employee is physically able to perform the duties of his or her employment, or the employee retires on a disability retirement allowance, whichever occurs first.

The maximum portion of the injured employee’s regular compensation that the municipality or county may continue to pay is the difference between the total amount that the injured employee is receiving from workers’ compensation benefits and disability benefits from the trust fund created under Section 45-2-21 and the amount of the employee’s regular compensation.

At such time as the injured employee is no longer receiving any workers’ compensation benefits or disability benefits from the trust fund created under Section 45-2-21, the municipality or county may continue to pay the full amount of the employee’s regular compensation for such period of time as allowed under the policy.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 495, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.